src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON CLASS-US-STEM-2-INFL !!= @CODE@
+Imm+Pres:%>a # ;
+Simp+Pres:%>áng # ;
+Dir+Past:%>án # ;
+NonFact:%>áng # ;
+Interr+Pres+Hab:%>áng # ;
+Pres+Hab:%>ánggang # ;
+Pres+Hab+NonFact:%>ángang # ;
+Dir+Past+Hab:%>íinii # ;
+Interr+Past+Hab:%>áangaa # ;
+Indir+Past+Hab:%>áangaan # ;
+Interr+Near+Fut:%>áng% k̲asaʼáa # ;
+Near+Fut:%>áng% k̲asaʼáang # ;
+Interr+VNear+Fut:%>áng% k̲asaasdláa # ;
+VNear+Fut:%>áng% k̲asaasdláang # ;
+Cert+Pres:%>ʼahlánggang # ;
+Cert+Past:%>ʼahlánggan # ;
+Cert+Past+Hab:%>ʼahlánggiinii # ;
+Cert+Rel:%>ʼahláns # ;
+Rflx:%>ʼahl # ;
+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab:%>ángʼwaa # ;
+3pl+Pres+Hab:%>ángʼwaang # ;
+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact:%>ángʼwaa%.ang # ;
+Neg+Pres+Hab:%>ángʼanggang # ;
+Neg+Pres+Hab+NonFact:%>ángʼangang # ;
+Neg+Interr+Near+Fut:%>áng% k̲asaaʼáng # ;
+Neg+Near+Fut:%>áng% k̲asaaʼánggang # ;
+Neg+Interr+VNear+Fut:%>áng% k̲asaasdläʼáng # ;
+Neg+VNear+Fut:%>áng% k̲asaasdläʼánggang # ;
+Neg+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab:%>ángʼangʼwaa # ;
+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab:%>ángʼangʼwaang # ;
+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact:%>ángʼangʼwaa%.ang # ;

LEXICON CLASS-US-STEM-3-INFL !!= @CODE@
+Cond-Aux2:%> # ;
+Interr+Past:%>áa # ;
+Indir+Past:%>áan # ;
+Rel+Evid:%>áas # ;
+Past+NonFact:%>áa%.ang # ;
+Ints+Past:%>áaʼahlang # ;
+Cont:%>áaʼahlanggaa # ;
+Ctfact+Pres:%>áaʼahlanggang # ;


LEXICON CLASS-UUHL !!= @CODE@
+V:úuhl                  CLASS-UUHL-STEM-1-INFL ;
+V:úl                    CLASS-UUHL-STEM-2-INFL ;
+V:wáal                  CLASS-UUHL-STEM-3-INFL ;
+V+Ext:úuhldaal          CLASS-AAL-INFL  ;
+V+Circum:úuhlgwaang     CLASS-AANG-INFL  ;
+V+Stand-Sg:úuhlgyaʼáng            CLASS-ANG-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Stand-Sg:úuhlgyaʼáang           CLASS-ANG-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Stand-Pl:úuhlgyaʼáang           CLASS-AANG-INFL  ;
+V+Order:úuhlhahl                  CLASS-AHL-INFL  ;
+V+Incep:úuhlhid                   CLASS-ID-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Incep:úuhlhíid                  CLASS-ID-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Almost:úuhlsgä                  CLASS-A-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Almost:úuhlsgáa                 CLASS-A-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Nocturn:úuhlʼuhlä               CLASS-A-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Nocturn:úuhlʼuhláa              CLASS-A-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Sit-Sg:úuhlʼwä                  CLASS-A-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Sit-Sg:úuhlʼwáa                 CLASS-A-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Sit-Pl:úuhlʼwaʼáang             CLASS-AANG-INFL  ;
+V+Nocturn+Distrib:úuhlʼuhláaʼagang   CLASS-ANG-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Nocturn+Distrib:úuhlʼuhláaʼagaang  CLASS-ANG-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Distrib:úuhlháalagang        CLASS-ANG-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Distrib:úuhlháalaagaang      CLASS-ANG-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Incep:úuhlhahlhid         CLASS-ID-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Incep:úuhlhahlhíid        CLASS-ID-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Almost:úuhlhahlsgä        CLASS-A-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Almost:úuhlhahlsgáa       CLASS-A-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Nocturn:úuhlhahlʼuhlä     CLASS-A-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Nocturn:úuhlhahlʼuhláa    CLASS-A-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Incep+Order:úuhlhidhahl         CLASS-AHL-INFL  ;
+V+Incep+Almost:úuhlhidsgä         CLASS-A-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Incep+Almost:úuhlhidsgáa        CLASS-A-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Nocturn+Order:úuhlʼuhlahahl     CLASS-AHL-INFL  ;
