src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERBS !!= @CODE@
gúuhl:g CLASS-UUHL "for S to be in love with X, infatuated with X" ;
INS% skʼúuhl:INS% skʼ CLASS-UUHL "for S to make C watertight, waterproof, plug the holes in C" ;
jáagä% gúuhl:jáagä% g CLASS-UUHL "for S to be in love" ;
skʼúuhl:skʼ CLASS-UUHL "for S to be watertight, waterproof" ;
tʼahlgúuhl:tʼahlg CLASS-UUHL "for S to put or wrap O around their shoulders" ;
tsʼáng% skʼúuhl:tsʼáng% skʼ CLASS-UUHL "for S to be tightly woven" ;
